Utah statutes.
26-8a-208.   Fees for training equipment rental, testing, and quality
assurance reviews.
(1) The department may charge fees, established pursuant to Section 26-1-6:
(a)  for the use of department-owned training equipment;
(b)  to administer tests and conduct quality assurance reviews; and
(c)  to process an application for a certificate, designation, permit, or
license.
(2) (a)  Fees collected under Subsections (1)(a) and (b) shall be separate
dedicated credits.
(b)  Fees under Subsection (1)(a) may be used to purchase training equipment.
(c)  Fees under Subsection (1)(b) may be used to administer tests and conduct
quality assurance reviews.
(3)  Fees and other funding available to purchase training equipment and to
administer tests and conduct quality assurance reviews shall be nonlapsing.
